Louisiana, session 2026, HB773.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1157(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1157. Sales of goods and services; contractual powers
A.(1) Except as provided in Subparagraph (2) of this Paragraph, state
agencies shall purchase, if available, goods and services from prison enterprises, or
products manufactured in a certified Private Sector/Prison Industry Enhancement
Program, if the prices are less than those of central purchasing.
(2) State Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, state agencies
which operate a state prison may purchase, if available, goods and services a good
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
or service from vendors a vendor located in the parish in which the prison facility is
located, if the prices are price for the good or service is less than those of central
purchasing or the price offered through prison enterprises, enterprises or the lowest
price for the good or service offered through a cooperative purchasing contract
entered into by the office of state procurement at the time the good or service is
contracted. and the For purchases pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph, the
vendor meets must also meet the requirements of the Hudson Initiative, as provided
in R.S. 39:2001 et seq., or the Veteran Initiative, as provided in R.S. 39:2171 et seq.
(3) (2)(a) Goods and services from prison enterprises, or products
manufactured in a certified Private Sector/Prison Industry Enhancement Program,
may be sold to the governing authorities of parishes, municipalities, other political
subdivisions, and public employees.
(b) Sales of manufactured products to public employees shall be priced at the
current prison enterprises contract price or based on established and documented
pricing methodologies.
(4) (3)(a) Services shall be provided at a cost that is not less than the cost to
the department for providing the services and not more than the lowest price for the
service offered through a cooperative purchasing contract entered into by the office
of state procurement at the time the prison enterprises service is contracted.
Manufactured products shall be provided at a cost that is not less than the cost of the
raw materials used to manufacture the product and not more than the lowest price for
the product offered through a cooperative purchasing contract entered into by the
office of state procurement at the time the prison enterprises product is contracted.
If no equivalent cooperative purchasing contract for the service or product has been
entered into by the office of state procurement at the time the prison enterprise
service or product is to be contracted, then the cost for that good or service for that
contract shall not exceed fifteen percent of fair market value for such good or
service, as determined by the office of state procurement.
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
(b) If Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
if the manufactured product is deemed to be spoiled, overstocked, obsolete or
otherwise not salable at a cost equal to or greater than the raw material cost of the
manufactured product and can be documented as such, the director may authorize a
sale at less than the raw material cost. Sales of manufactured products to public
employees shall be priced at the current prison enterprises contract price or based on
established and documented pricing methodologies.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 38:2261 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2261. Preference for goods manufactured, manufactured or services performed,
performed by prison enterprises or individuals with disabilities through
supported employment providers; non-applicability of competitive bidding
requirements; coordinating council requirements
A. Every agency as defined in R.S. 39:1556 shall give a preference in its
purchasing practices to goods manufactured supplies and services performed by
individuals with disabilities through supported employment providers. qualifying for
a preference pursuant to R.S. 39:1604.4. The provisions of R.S. 39:1604.4 shall
apply to any such purchase.
B. The requirements for competitive bidding contained in Part II of this
Chapter shall be inapplicable to cases in which an any purchase by an agency as
defined in R.S. 39:1556 uses goods manufactured, or services performed, by
individuals with disabilities through supported employment providers, provided the
goods manufactured or services performed are equal in quality and reasonable in the
rate charged based upon those goods and services available from other providers.
made pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
C. The State Use Council for the Purchase of Goods and Services Provided
by Individuals with Disabilities established pursuant to R.S. 39:1604.4(B) shall
coordinate and facilitate the carrying out of the provisions of this Section. The
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
membership of this council shall be determined by the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Health.
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms are defined as
follows:
(1) "Goods manufactured and services performed by individuals with
disabilities" shall have the meaning as defined in R.S. 39:1604.4(D).
(2) "Individuals with disabilities" shall have the meaning as defined in R.S.
39:1604.4(D).
(3) "Supported employment provider" shall have the meaning as defined in
R.S. 39:1604.4(D). the terms "services" and "supplies" shall have the same
meanings as in R.S. 39:1556.
Section 3. R.S. 39:1604.4 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1604.4. Preference for goods manufactured, or services performed by prison
enterprises or individuals with disabilities through supported employment
providers; definitions; coordinating council disabilities; definitions
A. Every agency shall give a preference in its purchasing practices to goods
manufactured and services performed by individuals with disabilities through
supported employment providers, provided such goods manufactured or services
performed are equal in quality and reasonable in the rate charged based upon those
goods and services available from other providers.
B. There is hereby created within the Louisiana Department of Health, the
"State Use Council for the Purchase of Goods and Services Provided by Individuals
with Disabilities", hereinafter referred to as "council", whose function shall be to
coordinate and facilitate carrying out the provisions of this Section and the
provisions of R.S. 38:2261.
(1) The membership of the council shall be determined by the secretary of
the Louisiana Department of Health.
(2) The council shall have authority to designate and contract with a central
nonprofit agency to assist supported employment providers in submitting
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
applications for the selection of suitable goods and services, to facilitate the
allocation of orders among qualified supported employment providers, and otherwise
to assist the council in performing its functions.
(3) The council shall solicit and evaluate competitive sealed proposals
pursuant to R.S. 39:1595 at least every five years to designate and contract with a
central nonprofit agency.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health may adopt, promulgate, and enforce
such rules and regulations as are necessary and appropriate to implement the
provisions of this Section and the provisions of R.S. 38:2261. The regulations shall
be promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950
et seq.
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms are defined as
follows:
(1) "Central nonprofit agency for individuals with disabilities" means an
agency that:
(a) Is incorporated under the Louisiana Nonprofit Corporation Law and
operated in the interests of individuals with disabilities, and the income of which
does not inure in whole or in part to the benefit of any shareholder or other private
individual.
(b) Complies with any applicable occupational health and safety standards
provided by the statutes or regulations of this state and of the United States.
(2) "Client" means an individual with a disability who is employed by a
supported employment provider.
(3) "Direct labor" means all labor involved in the manufacture of goods or
the performance of services except for supervision, instruction, administration, and
shipping.
(4) "Goods manufactured and services performed by individuals with
disabilities" means goods and services for which not less than forty percent of the
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
man-hours of direct labor required for manufacture or performance is provided by
individuals with disabilities.
(5) "Individuals with disabilities" means individuals with a physical,
behavioral, developmental, intellectual, sensory, mental, or addictive disorder which
constitutes a substantial obstacle to their employment.
(6) "Supported employment provider" means a nonprofit organization,
program, or entity as defined by R.S. 12:201 et seq., which provides gainful,
competitive, integrated employment, training, and rehabilitation services for
individuals with disabilities in compliance with a central nonprofit agency for
individuals with disabilities. In Fiscal Years 2019-2020 and 2020-2021, "supported
employment provider" shall also include any sheltered workshop transitioning to a
model of gainful, competitive, integrated employment, training, and rehabilitation
services for individuals with disabilities.
A. To advance the social and economic goals of integrating the productivity
of incarcerated and disabled individuals into the state's workforce in order to
improve well-being and social outcomes, beginning January 1, 2027, preference shall
be given to certain providers in accordance with the provisions of this Section.
Procurement in accordance with the provisions of this Section shall be through
noncompetitive contract.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Nonprofit" means a nonprofit organization chartered pursuant to Section
501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) "Preferred source" means a vendor with a supply or service accorded
preference pursuant to the provisions of this Section and includes prison enterprises.
(3) "Prison enterprises" shall mean the program of production and labor
administered and offered through the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
pursuant to Part XIV of Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950.
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
(4) "Qualified nonprofit" means a nonprofit vendor selling a supply or
service pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
C. Subject to restrictions provided in this Section, in the awarding of
contracts by a using agency, preference shall be given to supplies produced and
services rendered by the following:
(1) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections through prison
enterprises.
(2) Any nonprofit for the blind.
(3) Any nonprofit for other severely disabled persons.
(4) Any nonprofit or nonprofit workshop for veterans.
D.(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the state chief procurement officer, in
consultation with and using information provided by the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, Louisiana Works, and the Louisiana Department of Health, shall
maintain and make available to prospective vendors, using agencies, and other
interested parties a list of supplies and services available from providers the
procurement of which would qualify for a preference pursuant to the provisions of
this Section.
(2) A supply or service shall only be eligible for a preference pursuant to the
provisions of this Section after formal addition to such list in accordance with the
provisions of this Paragraph. The list shall be revised as necessary to reflect the
additions and deletions of supplies and services. Any revision to this list shall be
submitted to the state chief procurement officer by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections, Louisiana Works, or the Louisiana Department of
Health.
E. Priority among preferred providers shall be as follows:
(1)(a) If a supply is available in the form, function, and utility required by a
using agency, then the supply shall be purchased first from prison enterprises within
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
(b) If a supply is available in the form, function, and utility required by a
using agency and the supply is not available pursuant to Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, then the supply shall be purchased from an approved charitable nonprofit
for the blind or the facilitating entity identified in Subsection G of this Section.
(c) If a supply is not available pursuant to Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this
Paragraph and is available in the form, function, and utility required by a using
agency from any other preferred source, then the supply shall be purchased from any
other preferred source or facilitating entity identified in Subsection G of this Section.
(d) If a supply is not available from a preferred source or facilitating entity
identified in Subsection G of this Section, then the supply shall be procured in
accordance with regular procurement procedures and methodologies as otherwise
required by this Chapter.
(2)(a) If a service is available in the form, function, and utility required by
a using agency, then the service shall be purchased first from prison enterprises.
(b) If a service is not available pursuant to Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, then equal priority shall be accorded the services rendered and offered for
sale by other preferred sources in accordance with the following:
(i) A using agency shall make reasonable efforts to provide a notification
describing its requirements to those preferred sources, or to the facilitating entity
identified in Subsection G of this Section, which provides the required services as
indicated on the official public list maintained by the office of state procurement
pursuant to Subsection D of this Section.
(ii) If, within ten days of the notification required by Item (i) of this
Subparagraph, a preferred source or facilitating entity identified in Subsection G of
this Section submits a notice of intent to provide the service in the form, function,
and utility required, the service shall be procured from such source in accordance
with the provisions of this Section. If more than one preferred source or facilitating
entity identified in Subsection G of this Section submits a notice of intent and meets
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
the requirements, cost shall be the determining factor for purchase among the
preferred sources.
(iii) If, within ten days of the notification required by Item (ii) of this
Subparagraph, no preferred source or facilitating entity identified in Subsection G
of this Section indicates intent to provide the service, then the service shall be
procured in accordance with regular procurement procedures and methodologies as
otherwise required by this Chapter. No preference pursuant to the provisions of this
Section shall be accorded a preferred source in such a procurement.
F.(1) The prices to be charged for supplies produced or services provided by
prison enterprises shall be established in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
15:1151 et seq.
(2) Except as provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the price to be
charged for any supply produced or service provided by a preferred source or
facilitating entity identified in Subsection G of this Section shall not exceed the
lowest price for the supply or service, as applicable, offered through a cooperative
purchasing contract entered into by the office of state procurement at the time the
supply or service is procured. If no equivalent cooperative purchasing contract for
the supply or service has been entered into by the office of state procurement at the
time the supply or service is to be procured, then the cost for that supply or service
for that procurement shall not exceed fifteen percent of fair market value for the
supply or service, as determined by the office of state procurement.
(3)(a) A preferred source may procure a supply for a contract let though the
provisions of this Section through any of the following:
(i) A cooperative purchasing arrangement as provided in R.S. 39:1702 and
in accordance with any conditions set by the office of state procurement.
(ii) Prison enterprises.
(b) The preferred source shall accept sole responsibility for any payment due
the vendor for a procurement executed pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph.
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773
G. The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health shall appoint a
nonprofit, other than the nonprofit representing the other disabled, to facilitate the
distribution of orders among qualified nonprofits for the blind. The secretary shall
also appoint a nonprofit, other than the nonprofit representing the blind, to facilitate
the distribution of orders among qualified nonprofits for the other disabled. The
secretary of the Louisiana Works shall appoint a nonprofit, other than the nonprofits
appointed to represent the blind and other disabled persons, to facilitate the
distribution of orders among qualified veterans' nonprofits and workshops.
Section 4. No later than December 31, 2026, the state chief procurement officer, in
consultation with the secretaries of the Louisiana Department of Health, the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections, and Louisiana Works, shall prepare a list of all supplies and
services that are available and are being provided as of said date for purchase by a using
agency from those entities that would otherwise qualify as a preferred source pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 39:1604.4 as amended by this Act. This list may include references to
catalogs and other descriptive literature which are available directly from the entity.
Section 5. The provisions of this Act shall only apply to new procurements executed
on and after January 1, 2027.
Section 6.(A) The provisions of this Section and Section 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration
of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article
III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently
approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
(B) The provisions of Sections 1 through 3 and 5 of this Act shall become effective
January 1, 2027.
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-22 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 773